Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. Access to the collective and individual protections afforded by established federal and state labor laws, as well as ensuring stable, effective, and efficient labor-management relations, is a vital state interest that has critical benefit to the state's economic and social development. It is declared to be the policy of the state to guarantee agricultural employees the full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of representatives of their own choosing, to negotiate the terms and conditions of their employment, and that they shall be free from interference, restraint, or coercion of agricultural employers of labor, or their agents, in the designation of such representatives or in self-organization or in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protections. Therefore, this act extends collective bargaining rights to agricultural employees.The agricultural context often poses significant barriers for employees attempting to undertake concerted activity, such as seasonal and short-term employment and high numbers of employees who are limited English proficient and have had limited opportunity for educational attainment. It is the policy of the state to administer agricultural collective bargaining rights in a manner that takes these barriers into account, including by having procedures that are expeditious and linguistically and culturally appropriate.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This chapter applies to agricultural employees and agricultural employers.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1)(a) "Agricultural employee" means any person engaged in agriculture, any individual engaged or permitted by an agricultural employer to work on a farm, and also means a person engaged in the canning, processing, preserving, freezing, drying, marketing, storing, packing for shipment, or distributing of:(i) Agricultural produce;(ii) Meat and fish products; or(iii) Perishable foods.(b) "Agricultural employee" includes any person whose work has ceased because of, or in connection with, any prohibited practice.(c) "Agricultural employee" does not include:(i) Supervisors, managers, or those employees whose duties necessarily imply a confidential relationship to the agricultural employer;(ii) Those defined as employees under the federal national labor relations act, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 152(3);(iii) Employees as defined in RCW 49.37.010; or(iv) Members of an agricultural employer's family who are related to the third degree of consanguinity.(2) "Agricultural employer" means any person who employs agricultural employees and includes any person acting directly or indirectly as an agent of an agricultural employer, but does not include an employer as defined in RCW 49.37.010.(3) "Agriculture" includes farming in all its branches and, among other things, includes the cultivation and tillage of the soil, dairying, the production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any agricultural or horticultural commodities, including agricultural commodities as defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1141j(f), the raising of livestock, bees, fur-bearing animals, or poultry, and any practices, including any forestry or lumbering operations, performed by a farmer or on a farm as an incident to or in conjunction with such farming operations, including preparation for market, delivery to storage or to market, or to carriers for transportation to market.(4) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful farmworker labor organization that represents agricultural employees in their employment relations with the agricultural employers.(5) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual obligations of the agricultural employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters, including wages, hours, and working conditions, which may be peculiar to an appropriate bargaining unit of such agricultural employer, except that by such obligation neither party may be compelled to agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this chapter.(6) "Collective bargaining agreement" means any written contract or agreement that is currently in effect, or that will hereafter be executed, between a bargaining representative and an employer, as defined by this chapter.(7) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.(8) "Company union" means any committee, agricultural employee representation plan, or association of agricultural employees that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with agricultural employers concerning grievances or terms and conditions of employment, which the agricultural employer has initiated or created or whose initiation or creation the agricultural employer has suggested, participated in, or in the formulation of whose governing rules or policies or the conducting of whose management, operations, or elections the agricultural employer participates in or supervises or that the agricultural employer maintains, finances, controls, dominates, or assists in maintaining or financing, whether by compensating anyone for services performed in its behalf or by donating free services, equipment, materials, office or meeting space or anything else of value, or by any other means.(9) "Farmworker labor organization" means an organization of any kind that is not a company union, including agricultural employee committee or individuals acting in the interest of other agricultural employees, in which agricultural employees participate and exists for the primary purpose of dealing with agricultural employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of employment for agricultural employees.(10) "Labor dispute" means any controversy concerning terms, tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association of representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment, regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of agricultural employer and agricultural employee.(11) "Person" includes one or more individuals, labor organizations, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives, trustees in bankruptcy, or receivers.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) The commission shares concurrent jurisdiction with superior courts to prevent and to remedy any violation of RCW 49.32.020, as to agricultural employees and agricultural employers as defined in section 3 of this act.(2) The commission must apply the Washington courts' jurisprudence in adjudicating alleged violations of RCW 49.32.020.(3) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any violation of RCW 49.32.020, the commission shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from such violation, and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this chapter, such as the payment of damages and the reinstatement of agricultural employees, and reasonable attorneys' fees in cases where wages are recovered.(4) The commission or the affected agricultural employees may petition the superior court for the county in which the main office of the employer is located or in which the person who has engaged or is engaging in such violation resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of the commission's order and for appropriate temporary relief.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The commission shall provide, at the mutual request of an agricultural employer and an exclusive bargaining representative, mediation of any labor dispute between them.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. (1) In the event that an agricultural employer and agricultural employees are in disagreement as to the selection of a bargaining representative, a farmworker labor organization shall invite the commission to intervene.(2) In the event that an agricultural employer and a bargaining representative are in disagreement as to the merger of two or more bargaining units in the agricultural employer's workforce that are represented by the same bargaining representative, the commission shall be invited to intervene.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. The commission, after hearing upon reasonable notice, shall decide in each application for certification as an exclusive bargaining representative or unit clarification, the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining. In determining, modifying, or combining the bargaining unit, the commission shall consider: The duties, skills, and working conditions of the agricultural employees; the history of collective bargaining by the agricultural employees and their bargaining representatives; the extent of organization among the agricultural employees; and the desire of the agricultural employees, and the avoidance of excessive fragmentation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. The commission must determine the bargaining representative by:(1) Conducting a cross-check pursuant to section 9 of this act; or(2) Conducting an election pursuant to section 10 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. (1) If a farmworker labor organization seeking to represent agricultural employees has filed LM forms for the preceding two years with the federal department of labor and is the only farmworker labor organization seeking certification as exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit for which there is no incumbent exclusive bargaining representative, the commission may determine the question concerning representation by conducting a cross-check comparing the bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the agricultural employer. A determination through a cross-check process may be made upon a showing of interest submitted in support of the exclusive bargaining representative by more than 50 percent of the agricultural employees.(2) The farmworker labor organization that has been determined through cross-check to represent a majority of the agricultural employees in the bargaining unit shall be certified by the commission as the exclusive bargaining representative of, and shall be required to represent, all the agricultural employees within the unit without regard to membership in said bargaining representative.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. (1) If a farmworker labor organization seeking to represent agricultural employees has not filed LM forms with the federal department of labor for the preceding two years, or is not the only farmworker labor organization seeking certification as the exclusive bargaining representative, the commission shall conduct an election to ascertain the exclusive bargaining representative and upon the request of a farmworker labor organization showing written proof of at least 30 percent representation of the agricultural employees within the unit. The commission shall, within 10 calendar days from the showing, hold an election by secret ballot to determine the issue. The ballot shall contain the name of such farmworker labor organization and of any other farmworker labor organization showing written proof of at least 10 percent representation of the agricultural employees within the unit, together with a choice for any agricultural employee to designate that they do not desire to be represented by any bargaining representative.(2) Where more than one organization is on the ballot and neither of the three or more choices receives a majority vote of the agricultural employees within the bargaining unit, a runoff election shall be held. The runoff ballot shall contain the two choices which received the largest and second-largest number of votes.(3) The farmworker labor organization that has been determined through election to represent a majority of the voting agricultural employees shall be certified by the commission as the exclusive bargaining representative of, and shall be required to represent, all the agricultural employees within the unit without regard to membership in said bargaining representative.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. No question concerning representation may be raised within one year of a certification or attempted certification. Where there is a valid collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question of representation may be raised except during the period not more than 90 nor less than 60 days prior to the expiration date of the agreement. Any agreement which contains a provision for automatic renewal or extension of the agreement is not effective as a bar to a question concerning representation if it extends the total term of the agreement's existence for more than three years.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. The commission shall provide, at the mutual request of an agricultural employer and an exclusive bargaining representative, mediation of any labor dispute between them. Any party to mediation may request and shall receive fact-finding by the mediator at the conclusion of a failed mediation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. (1) Upon the certification of an exclusive bargaining representative for the agricultural employer's employees, the agricultural employer has the duty to engage in collective bargaining with the exclusive bargaining representative before changing any wages, hours, or working conditions of the represented agricultural employees. Any allegation by the exclusive bargaining representative that the agricultural employer has made a unilateral change in wages, hours, and working conditions may be presented for resolution to an arbitrator selected mutually or by application of the exclusive bargaining representative to the commission for provision of the arbitrator.(2) Should a collective bargaining agreement between the exclusive bargaining representative and the agricultural employer expire, its provisions, except any prohibition on strikes or lockouts, continue in force until renegotiated. During the agreement's hiatus, any allegation by the exclusive bargaining representative that the agricultural employer has made a unilateral change in wages or economic benefits may be presented for resolution to an arbitrator selected mutually or by application of the exclusive bargaining representative to the commission for provision of the arbitrator.(3) Upon the failure of the agricultural employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to conclude a collective bargaining agreement within three months of certification of the exclusive bargaining representative or within three months of the expiration of the last collective bargaining agreement, all matters remaining in dispute shall be submitted by the parties to the commission for resolution through interest arbitration.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. (1) If an agreement through bargaining has not been reached within three months of certification, or within three months of the expiration of the last collective bargaining agreement, the parties may agree in writing to continue to bargain for an additional month. Thereafter they may agree in writing to continue bargaining on a month-to-month basis. If the parties have not entered into a written agreement to extend bargaining, or the final agreement to extend bargaining has expired, the parties must submit their dispute to interest arbitration. Each party shall submit that party's last and final proposals upon which there exists an impasse. All impasse items shall be submitted to arbitration under this section. The arbitrator or arbitration panel is empowered to review the parties' final proposals and to consider mediator findings, if any, and to issue a decision on the submitted items along with the previously agreed items, such that a complete agreement is imposed through the arbitration. The arbitrator or arbitration panel is also empowered to consider evidence submitted by the parties concerning factors such as the employer's ability to meet the costs of a contract, employee compensation at comparable employers, and cost of living in the relevant geographic area in their decision-making process.(2) If the parties cannot agree on the arbitrator or arbitration panel within five days of the expiration of the three-month period following certification or expiration of the previous agreement, the parties shall apply to the commission or, if both parties agree, the American arbitration association to provide a list of five qualified arbitrators from which the arbitrator or arbitration panel shall be chosen. Each party shall pay one-half of the fees and expenses of the arbitration and of the recording of the proceedings.(3) In consultation with the parties, the arbitrator or arbitration panel shall promptly establish a date, time, and place for a hearing which shall be no later than two months following the appointment of the arbitrator or arbitration panel. The arbitrator or arbitration panel shall provide reasonable notice thereof to the parties to the dispute. The parties shall exchange final positions in writing, with copies to the arbitrator or arbitration panel, with respect to every issue to be arbitrated, on a date mutually agreed upon, but in no event later than 10 working days before the date set for the hearing. A hearing shall be held, and each party shall have the opportunity to present evidence and make arguments. The rules of evidence prevailing in judicial proceedings may be considered, but are not binding, and any oral testimony or documentary evidence or other data deemed relevant by the arbitrator or chair of the arbitration panel may be received in evidence. A recording of the proceedings shall be taken. The arbitrator or arbitration panel shall have the power to administer oaths, require the attendance of witnesses, and require the production of such books, papers, contracts, agreements, and documents as may be deemed by the arbitrator or chair of the arbitration panel to be material to a just determination of the issues in dispute. If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the arbitrator or arbitration panel, or refuses to be sworn or to make an affirmation to testify, or any witness, party, or attorney for a party is guilty of any contempt while in attendance at any hearing held hereunder, the arbitrator may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court in the county where the labor dispute exists, and the court has jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. Any failure to obey the order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.(4) Within 30 days following the conclusion of the hearing, the arbitrator or arbitration panel shall make written findings of fact and a written determination of the issues in dispute, based on the evidence presented. A copy thereof shall be served on each of the parties to the dispute. That determination is final and binding upon both parties, subject to review by the superior court upon the application of either party.(5) The superior court's scope of review is limited to whether:(a) The arbitrator or arbitration panel acted without, or in excess of, their powers;(b) The arbitration has proceeded in the manner required by law;(c) The order or decision of the arbitrator or arbitration panel was procured by fraud or was an abuse of discretion;(d) The decision of the arbitrator or arbitration panel was arbitrary or capricious; and(e) The arbitrator's or arbitration panel's decision violated either of the parties' constitutional or statutory rights.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. (1) In addition to any contractually agreed method for selecting arbitrators, the parties may mutually request the commission to, and the commission shall, appoint a qualified person who may be an employee of the commission to act as an arbitrator to assist in the resolution of a labor dispute between an agricultural employer and an exclusive bargaining representative arising from the application of the matters contained in a collective bargaining agreement. The arbitrator shall conduct such arbitration of such dispute in a manner as provided for in the collective bargaining agreement. The commission may not collect any fees or charges from such agricultural employer or such exclusive bargaining representative for services performed by the commission under the provisions of this chapter.(2) The provisions of chapter 49.08 RCW do not apply to this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 16. Nothing in this chapter, except as specifically provided for herein, interferes with, impedes, or diminishes in any way the right to strike.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 17. Actions taken by or on behalf of the commission shall be pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, or rules adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the right of judicial review provided by chapter 34.05 RCW is applicable to all such actions and rules.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 18. The commission shall promulgate, revise, or rescind such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary or appropriate to administer the provisions of this chapter in conformity with the intent and purpose of this chapter and consistent with the best standards of labor-management relations and the conditions of the agricultural industry.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 19. The commission must create signage in the five most common foreign languages used in Washington outlining the rights established under this chapter. A copy of the signage must be provided to each agricultural employer covered under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 20. Sections 1 through 19 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.Sec. 21. RCW 49.32.020 and 2010 c 8 s 12028 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In the interpretation of this chapter and in determining the jurisdiction and authority of the courts of the state of Washington, as such jurisdiction and authority are herein defined and limited, the public policy of the state of Washington is hereby declared as follows:WHEREAS, Under prevailing economic conditions, developed with the aid of governmental authority for owners of property to organize in the corporate and other forms of ownership association, the individual unorganized worker is commonly helpless to exercise actual liberty of contract and to protect his or her freedom of labor, and thereby to obtain acceptable terms and conditions of employment, wherefore, though he or she should be free to decline to associate with his or her fellows, it is necessary that he or she have full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of representatives of his or her own choosing, to negotiate the terms and conditions of his or her employment, and that he or she shall be free from interference, restraint, or coercion of employers of labor, or their agents, in the designation of such representatives or in self-organization or in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protections; therefore, the following definitions of, and limitations upon, the jurisdiction and authority of the courts of the state of Washington are hereby enacted.(2) With regard to any agricultural employer or agricultural employee, the public employment relations commission has concurrent jurisdiction to prevent and to remedy any violation of the rights set forth in subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 22. RCW 5.60.060 and 2025 c 346 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A spouse or domestic partner shall not be examined for or against his or her spouse or domestic partner, without the consent of the spouse or domestic partner; nor can either during marriage or during the domestic partnership or afterward, be without the consent of the other, examined as to any communication made by one to the other during the marriage or the domestic partnership. But this exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding against a spouse or domestic partner if the marriage or the domestic partnership occurred subsequent to the filing of formal charges against the defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime committed by said spouse or domestic partner against any child of whom said spouse or domestic partner is the parent or guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 71.05 or 71.09 RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse or the domestic partner of a person sought to be detained under chapter 71.05 or 71.09 RCW may not be compelled to testify and shall be so informed by the court prior to being called as a witness.(2)(a) An attorney or counselor shall not, without the consent of his or her client, be examined as to any communication made by the client to him or her, or his or her advice given thereon in the course of professional employment.(b) A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal charge may not be examined as to a communication between the child and his or her attorney if the communication was made in the presence of the parent or guardian. This privilege does not extend to communications made prior to the arrest.(3) A member of the clergy, a Christian Science practitioner listed in the Christian Science Journal, or a priest shall not, without the consent of a person making the confession or sacred confidence, be examined as to any confession or sacred confidence made to him or her in his or her professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the church to which he or she belongs.(4) Subject to the limitations under RCW 71.05.217 (6) and (7), a physician or surgeon or osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon shall not, without the consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil action as to any information acquired in attending such patient, which was necessary to enable him or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as follows:(a) In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's injury, neglect, or sexual abuse or the cause thereof; and(b) Ninety days after filing an action for personal injuries or wrongful death, the claimant shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of the physician-patient privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes a waiver of the privilege as to all physicians or conditions, subject to such limitations as a court may impose pursuant to court rules.(5) A public officer shall not be examined as a witness as to communications made to him or her in official confidence, when the public interest would suffer by the disclosure.(6)(a) A peer supporter shall not, without consent of the peer support services recipient making the communication, be compelled to testify about any communication made to the peer supporter by the peer support services recipient while receiving individual or group services. The peer supporter must be designated as such by their employing agency prior to providing peer support services. The privilege only applies when the communication was made to the peer supporter while acting in his or her capacity as a peer supporter. The privilege applies regardless of whether the peer support services recipient is an employee of the same agency as the peer supporter. Peer support services may be coordinated or designated among first responder agencies pursuant to chapter 10.93 RCW, interlocal agreement, or other similar provision, provided however that a written agreement is not required for the privilege to apply. The privilege does not apply if the peer supporter was an initial responding first responder, department of corrections staff person, or jail staff person; a witness; or a party to the incident which prompted the delivery of peer support services to the peer support services recipient.(b) For purposes of this section:(i) "First responder" means:(A) A law enforcement officer;(B) A limited authority law enforcement officer;(C) A firefighter;(D) An emergency services dispatcher or recordkeeper;(E) Emergency medical personnel, as licensed or certified by this state;(F) A member or former member of the Washington national guard acting in an emergency response capacity pursuant to chapter 38.52 RCW;(G) A coroner or medical examiner, or a coroner's or medical examiner's agent or employee; or(H) An individual engaged in co-response services, as defined in RCW 71.24.025.(ii) "Law enforcement officer" means a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.(iii) "Limited authority law enforcement officer" means a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 who is employed by the department of corrections, state parks and recreation commission, department of natural resources, liquor and cannabis board, or Washington state gambling commission.(iv) "Peer support services recipient" means:(A) A first responder;(B) A department of corrections staff person; or(C) A jail staff person.(v) "Peer supporter" means:(A) A first responder, retired first responder, department of corrections staff person, or jail staff person or a civilian employee of a first responder entity or agency, local jail, or state agency who has received training to provide emotional and moral support and services to a peer support services recipient who needs those services as a result of an incident or incidents in which the peer support services recipient was involved while acting in his or her official capacity or to deal with other stress that is impacting the peer support services recipient's performance of official duties; or(B) A nonemployee who has been designated by the first responder entity or agency, local jail, statewide organization focused on co-response outreach, or state agency to provide emotional and moral support and counseling to a peer support services recipient who needs those services as a result of an incident or incidents in which the peer support services recipient was involved while acting in his or her official capacity.(7) A sexual assault advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any communication made between the victim and the sexual assault advocate.(a) For purposes of this section, "sexual assault advocate" means the employee or volunteer from a community sexual assault program or underserved populations provider, victim assistance unit, program, or association, that provides information, medical or legal advocacy, counseling, or support to victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the victim to accompany the victim to the hospital or other health care facility and to proceedings concerning the alleged assault, including police and prosecution interviews and court proceedings.(b) A sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another person. Any sexual assault advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of records and communications under this section shall have immunity from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be presumed.(8) A domestic violence advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be examined as to any communication between the victim and the domestic violence advocate.(a) For purposes of this section, "domestic violence advocate" means an employee or supervised volunteer from a community-based domestic violence program or human services program that provides information, advocacy, counseling, crisis intervention, emergency shelter, or support to victims of domestic violence and who is not employed by, or under the direct supervision of, a law enforcement agency, a prosecutor's office, or the child protective services section of the department of children, youth, and families as defined in RCW 26.44.020.(b) A domestic violence advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another person. This section does not relieve a domestic violence advocate from the requirement to report or cause to be reported an incident under RCW 26.44.030(1) or to disclose relevant records relating to a child as required by RCW 26.44.030(15). Any domestic violence advocate participating in good faith in the disclosing of communications under this subsection is immune from liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure under this subsection, the good faith of the domestic violence advocate who disclosed the confidential communication shall be presumed.(9) A mental health counselor, independent clinical social worker, or marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW may not disclose, or be compelled to testify about, any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable the individual to render professional services to those persons except:(a) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative;(b) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(c) In response to a subpoena from the secretary of health. The secretary may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW 18.130.050;(d) As required under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW 71.05.217 (6) or (7); or(e) To any individual if the mental health counselor, independent clinical social worker, or marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other individual; however, there is no obligation on the part of the provider to so disclose.(10) An individual who acts as a sponsor providing guidance, emotional support, and counseling in an individualized manner to a person participating in an alcohol or drug addiction recovery fellowship may not testify in any civil action or proceeding about any communication made by the person participating in the addiction recovery fellowship to the individual who acts as a sponsor except with the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative.(11)(a) Neither a union representative nor an employee the union represents or has represented shall be examined as to, or be required to disclose, any communication between an employee and union representative or between union representatives made in the course of union representation except:(i) To the extent such examination or disclosure appears necessary to prevent the commission of a crime that is likely to result in a clear, imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of a person;(ii) In actions, civil or criminal, in which the represented employee is accused of a crime or assault or battery;(iii) In actions, civil or criminal, where a union member is a party to the action, the union member may obtain a copy of any statement previously given by that union member concerning the subject matter of the action and may elicit testimony concerning such statements. The right of the union member to obtain such statements, or the union member's possession of such statements, does not render them discoverable over the objection of the union member;(iv) In actions, regulatory, civil, or criminal, against the union or its affiliated, subordinate, or parent bodies or their agents; or(v) When an admission of, or intent to engage in, criminal conduct is revealed by the represented union member to the union representative.(b) The privilege created in this subsection (11) does not apply to any record of communications that would otherwise be subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.(c) The privilege created in this subsection (11) may not interfere with an employee's or union representative's applicable statutory mandatory reporting requirements, including but not limited to duties to report in chapters 26.44, 43.101, and 74.34 RCW.(d) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Employee" means a person represented by a certified or recognized union regardless of whether the employee is a member of the union.(ii) "Union" means any lawful organization that has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in their employment relations with employers, including without limitation labor organizations defined by 29 U.S.C. Sec. 152(5) and 5 U.S.C. Sec. 7103(a)(4), representatives defined by 45 U.S.C. Sec. 151, and bargaining representatives defined in RCW 41.56.030, and employee organizations as defined in RCW 28B.52.020, 41.59.020, 41.80.005, 41.76.005, 47.64.011, and 53.18.010, and farmworker labor organizations as defined in section 3 of this act.(iii) "Union representation" means action by a union on behalf of one or more employees it represents in regard to their employment relations with employers, including personnel matters, grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, conditions of work, or collective bargaining.(iv) "Union representative" means a person authorized by a union to act for the union in regard to union representation.(v) "Communication" includes any oral, written, or electronic communication or document containing such communication.--- END ---